Louisiana, session 2026, HB476.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:17.9 and 3996(B)(92) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§17.9. Safe Haven Law information; posting in schools
A. Each public school with students in any grade seven through twelve shall
display flyers designed by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services, hereafter referred to as the "department", in the prescribed locations and
in the manner provided for in this Section.
B. The content of each flyer, at a minimum, shall be as follows:
(1) A brief, age-appropriate heading that quickly communicates the nature
of the flyer.
(2) A summary of the Safe Haven Law (Children's Code Article 1149 et
seq.), including but not limited to a summary of the ways a child can be legally
surrendered.
(3) The URL to the section on the department's website about the Safe Haven
Law and a QR code that links to that section.
(4) Contact information to receive assistance relative to the Safe Haven Law.
(5) The Safe Haven Law logo.
C.(1) School employees shall display the flyer on the inside of the door to
each bathroom stall in each bathroom in the school building.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 476 ENROLLED
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, if a
bathroom is used in the normal course of a school day by students in sixth grade or
below, the school shall not be required to display the flyer in the bathroom but may
determine other approaches to inform students in grades seventh grade and above of
the content provided for in Subsection B of this Section.
D. The department shall make the flyer available for download on its
website.
E. The state Department of Education shall inform public school governing
authorities of how to obtain the flyer.
* * *
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
(92) Safe Haven Law flyers, R.S. 17:17.9.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.